Florida, session 2026, SB620.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 46 47 Section 1.âParagraph (d) of subsection (1) of section 48 99.021, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 49 99.021âForm of candidate oath.â 50 (1) 51 (d)1.âIn addition, each candidate, whether a party 52 candidate, a candidate with no party affiliation, or a write-in 53 candidate, shall, at the time of subscribing to the oath or 54 affirmation, state in writing whether he or she owes any 55 outstanding fines, fees, or penalties that cumulatively exceed 56 $250 for any violations of s. 8, Art. II of the State 57 Constitution; the Code of Ethics for Public Officers and 58 Employees under part III of chapter 112; any local ethics 59 ordinance governing standards of conduct and disclosure 60 requirements; or chapter 106. If the candidate owes any 61 outstanding fines, fees, or penalties exceeding the threshold 62 amount specified in this paragraph, he or she must also specify 63 the amount owed and each entity that levied such fine, fee, or 64 penalty. For purposes of this paragraph, any such fines, fees, 65 or penalties that have been paid in full at the time of 66 subscribing to the oath or affirmation are not deemed to be 67 outstanding. 68 2.âIn addition, each candidate seeking federal office, 69 whether a party candidate, a candidate with no party 70 affiliation, or a write-in candidate, shall, at the time of 71 subscribing to the oath or affirmation, state in writing whether 72 he or she intends to trade stocks if elected. 73 Section 2.âSection 99.0211, Florida Statutes, is created to 74 read: 75 99.0211âChallenging candidacy.â 76 (1)âA candidate must ensure that he or she will satisfy all 77 statutory and constitutional requirements for the office for 78 which he or she is seeking nomination or election. 79 (2)âA candidate or a political party with a candidate in 80 the same race, or an affiliated party committee as authorized by 81 s. 103.092, may challenge a candidateâs compliance with 82 subsection (1) by filing an action for declaratory and 83 injunctive relief in the circuit court for the county in which 84 the filing officer is headquartered. 85 (3)âA person may not be qualified as a candidate for 86 nomination or election, and his or her name may not appear on 87 the ballot, if, in an order that has become final, the court 88 determines that the candidate will not, at the time of 89 qualification, election, or assumption of office, as applicable, 90 satisfy all statutory and constitutional requirements for the 91 office for which he or she is seeking nomination or election. 92 (4)âA candidate, a political party, or an affiliated party 93 committee bringing an action for declaratory and injunctive 94 relief under subsection (2) is entitled to an expedited final 95 hearing, and any appeal of a final hearing must receive 96 expedited consideration by the appellate court. Upon a final 97 order of the circuit court which contains the determination 98 under subsection (3), the supervisor of elections in each county 99 affected by such candidacy shall remove the name of the 100 candidate from the ballot, or if the ballots have already been 101 printed, include a notice with each vote-by-mail ballot, and 102 post a notice at each early voting location and polling 103 precinct, stating that a vote for such candidate will not be 104 counted. 105 Section 3.âParagraph (a) of subsection (7) of section 106 99.061, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 107 99.061âMethod of qualifying for nomination or election to 108 federal, state, county, or district office.â 109 (7)(a)âIn order for a candidate to be qualified, the 110 following items must be received by the filing officer by the 111 end of the qualifying period: 112 1.âA properly executed check drawn upon the candidateâs 113 campaign account payable to the person or entity as prescribed 114 by the filing officer in an amount not less than the fee 115 required by s. 99.092, unless the candidate obtained the 116 required number of signatures on petitions pursuant to s. 117 99.095. The filing fee for a special district candidate is not 118 required to be drawn upon the candidateâs campaign account. If a 119 candidateâs check is returned by the bank for any reason, the 120 filing officer shall immediately notify the candidate and the 121 candidate shall have until the end of qualifying to pay the fee 122 with a cashierâs check purchased from funds of the campaign 123 account. Failure to pay the fee as provided in this subparagraph 124 shall disqualify the candidate. 125 2.âThe candidateâs oath required by s. 99.021, which must 126 contain the name of the candidate as it is to appear on the 127 ballot; the office sought, including the district or group 128 number if applicable; and the signature of the candidate, which 129 must be verified under oath or affirmation pursuant to s. 130 92.525(1)(a). 131 3.âIf the office sought is partisan, the written statement 132 of political party affiliation required by s. 99.021(1)(b); or 133 if the candidate is running without party affiliation for a 134 partisan office, the written statement required by s. 135 99.021(1)(c). 136 4.âIf the office sought is federal, the written statement 137 required by s. 99.021(1)(d)2. 138 5.4.âThe completed form for the appointment of campaign 139 treasurer and designation of campaign depository, as required by 140 s. 106.021. 141 6.5.âThe full and public disclosure or statement of 142 financial interests required by subsection (5). A public officer 143 who has filed the full and public disclosure or statement of 144 financial interests with the Commission on Ethics before 145 qualifying for office may file a copy of that disclosure or a 146 verification or receipt of electronic filing as provided in 147 subsection (5) at the time of qualifying. 148 7.âAn oath or affirmation in writing that states whether 149 the candidate is a citizen of another country in addition to 150 being a citizen of the United States, and, if so, discloses any 151 other country of which the candidate is also a citizen. 152 8.âFor a candidate seeking federal office, whether a party 153 candidate, a candidate with no party affiliation, or a write-in 154 candidate, an oath or affirmation in writing that states whether 155 the candidate previously held a federal office, and, if so, 156 discloses whether the candidate traded stocks while in such 157 office. 158 Section 4.âParagraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 159 105.031, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 160 105.031âQualification; filing fee; candidateâs oath; items 161 required to be filed.â 162 (5)âITEMS REQUIRED TO BE FILED.â 163 (a)âIn order for a candidate for judicial office or the 164 office of school board member to be qualified, the following 165 items must be received by the filing officer by the end of the 166 qualifying period: 167 1.âExcept for candidates for retention to judicial office, 168 a properly executed check drawn upon the candidateâs campaign 169 account in an amount not less than the fee required by 170 subsection (3) or, in lieu thereof, the copy of the notice of 171 obtaining ballot position pursuant to s. 105.035. If a 172 candidateâs check is returned by the bank for any reason, the 173 filing officer shall immediately notify the candidate and the 174 candidate shall, the end of qualifying notwithstanding, have 48 175 hours from the time such notification is received, excluding 176 Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, to pay the fee with a 177 cashierâs check purchased from funds of the campaign account. 178 Failure to pay the fee as provided in this subparagraph shall 179 disqualify the candidate. 180 2.âThe candidateâs oath required by subsection (4), which 181 must contain the name of the candidate as it is to appear on the 182 ballot; the office sought, including the district or group 183 number if applicable; and the signature of the candidate, duly 184 acknowledged. 185 3.âThe loyalty oath required by s. 876.05, signed by the 186 candidate and duly acknowledged. 187 4.âThe completed form for the appointment of campaign 188 treasurer and designation of campaign depository, as required by 189 s. 106.021. In addition, each candidate for judicial office, 190 including an incumbent judge, shall file a statement with the 191 qualifying officer, within 10 days after filing the appointment 192 of campaign treasurer and designation of campaign depository, 193 stating that the candidate has read and understands the 194 requirements of the Florida Code of Judicial Conduct. Such 195 statement shall be in substantially the following form: 196 197 Statement of Candidate for Judicial Office 198 199 I, ...(name of candidate)..., a judicial candidate, have 200 received, read, and understand the requirements of the Florida 201 Code of Judicial Conduct. 202 ...(Signature of candidate)... 203 ...(Date)... 204 205 5.âThe full and public disclosure of financial interests 206 required by s. 8, Art. II of the State Constitution or the 207 statement of financial interests required by s. 112.3145, 208 whichever is applicable. A public officer who has filed the full 209 and public disclosure or statement of financial interests with 210 the Commission on Ethics or the supervisor of elections prior to 211 qualifying for office may file a copy of that disclosure at the 212 time of qualifying. 213 6.âAn oath or affirmation in writing that states whether 214 the candidate is a citizen of another country in addition to 215 being a citizen of the United States, and, if so, discloses any 216 other country of which the candidate is also a citizen. 217 Section 5.âSubsection (3) is added to section 106.023, 218 Florida Statutes, to read: 219 106.023âStatement of candidate.â 220 (3)âAt the time of filing the statement of candidacy, a 221 candidate must also provide an oath or affirmation in writing 222 that states that he or she meets, or will meet at the time of 223 election for the office sought or at the time of assuming the 224 office, as applicable, all statutory and constitutional 225 qualifications for the office sought. 226 Section 6.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendments 227 made by this act to sections 99.061 and 105.031, Florida 228 Statutes, in references thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (1) 229 of section 99.012, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 230 99.012âRestrictions on individuals qualifying for public 231 office.â 232 (1)âAs used in this section: 233 (b)ââQualifyâ means to fulfill the requirements set forth 234 in s. 99.061(7)(a) or s. 105.031(5)(a). 235 Section 7.âNotwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 236 for the 2026 General Election: 237 (1)âAny candidate for representative to Congress seeking 238 ballot position by the petition process described in s. 99.095, 239 Florida Statutes, must obtain at least the number of signatures 240 equal to one-third of 1 percent of the ideal population for each 241 congressional district, as calculated by dividing the statewide 242 population in the most recent decennial census by the number of 243 representatives apportioned to the state after the most recent 244 decennial census. Signatures may be obtained from any registered 245 voter in Florida regardless of party affiliation or district 246 boundaries. Petitions must state that the candidate is seeking 247 the office of representative to Congress, but a district number 248 is not required. 249 (2)âEach person seeking to qualify for nomination or 250 election as a representative to Congress must file his or her 251 qualification papers, and pay the qualifying fee, which shall 252 consist of the filing fee and election assessment, and party 253 assessment, if any has been levied, to the Department of State, 254 or qualify by the petition process described in s. 99.095, 255 Florida Statutes, with the Department of State, at any time 256 after noon of the 1st day for qualifying, which shall be the 257 71st day before the primary election, but not later than noon of 258 the 67th day before the date of the primary election. 259 (3)âExcept as otherwise provided in this section, all 260 requirements and procedures relating to qualifying and to the 261 candidate petition process must conform to the requirements and 262 procedures in law. 263 Section 8.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.